hr-HR: Tip džepa za lacrosse: Tvrdi mrežasti džep; Visoki džep; Hibridni džep; Mrežasti džep; Srednji džep; Polutvrdi mrežasti džep; Polumeki mrežasti džep; Meki mrežasti džep; Tradicionalni džep; Mrežasti džep presvučen voskom; Ostalo
hu: Lakrosszzseb típusa: Kemény hálós zseb; Magas zseb; Hibrid zseb; Hálós zseb; Középső zseb; Félkemény hálós zseb; Félpuha hálós zseb; Puha hálós zseb; Hagyományos zseb; Viaszbevonatú hálós zseb; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta mrežice (žepa) na palici za lakros: Trd mrežasti žep; Visok žep; Hibridni žep; Mrežasti žep; Srednji žep; Poltrd mrežasti žep; Polmehek mrežasti žep; Mehek mrežasti žep; Tradicionalen žep; Z voskom prevlečen mrežasti žep; Drugo
tr: Lakros cep tipi: Sert ağ cep; Yüksek cep; Hibrit cep; Ağ cep; Orta cep; Yarı sert ağ cep; Yarı yumuşak ağ cep; Yumuşak ağ cep; Geleneksel cep; Balmumu kaplı ağ cep; Diğer
fi: Lacrosse-taskun tyyppi: Kova verkkopussi; Korkea pussi; Hybridipussi; Verkkopussi; Keskipussi; Puolikova verkkopussi; Puolipehmeä verkkopussi; Pehmeä verkkopussi; Perinteinen pussi; Vahattu verkkopussi; Muu
es: Tipo de bolsillo del palo de lacrosse: Bolsillo de malla dura; Bolsillo alto; Bolsillo híbrido; Bolsillo de malla; Bolsillo medio; Bolsillo de malla semidura; Bolsillo de malla semisuave; Bolsillo de malla suave; Bolsillo tradicional; Bolsillo de malla recubierta de cera; Otro
ru: Тип кармана для лакросса: Жесткий сетчатый карман; Высокий карман; Гибридный карман; Сетчатый карман; Средний карман; Полужесткий сетчатый карман; Полумягкий сетчатый карман; Мягкий сетчатый карман; Традиционный карман; Сетчатый карман с восковым покрытием; Другое
zh-CN: 长曲棍球网兜类型: 硬网兜; 高位网兜; 混合网兜; 网兜; 中位网兜; 半硬网兜; 半软网兜; 软网兜; 传统网兜; 涂蜡网兜; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo do bolso de lacrosse: Bolso em rede dura; Bolso alto; Bolso híbrido; Bolso em rede; Bolso médio; Bolso em rede semidura; Bolso em rede semimacia; Bolso em rede macia; Bolso tradicional; Bolso em rede revestida a cera; Outro
en: Lacrosse pocket type: Hard mesh pocket; High pocket; Hybrid pocket; Mesh pocket; Mid pocket; Semi-hard mesh pocket; Semi-soft mesh pocket; Soft mesh pocket; Traditional pocket; Wax-coated mesh pocket; Other
sk-SK: Typ výpletu hlavy lakrosovej hokejky: Tvrdé sieťové vrecko; Vysoké vrecko; Hybridné vrecko; Sieťové vrecko; Stredné vrecko; Polotvrdé sieťové vrecko; Polomäkké sieťové vrecko; Mäkké sieťové vrecko; Tradičné vrecko; Voskom potiahnuté sieťové vrecko; Iné
cs: Typ kapsy na lakros: Kapsa z tvrdé síťoviny; Vysoká kapsa; Hybridní kapsa; Kapsa ze síťoviny; Střední kapsa; Kapsa z polotvrdé síťoviny; Kapsa z poloměkké síťoviny; Kapsa z měkké síťoviny; Tradiční kapsa; Kapsa z voskované síťoviny; Jiné
ro-RO: Tip buzunar pentru lacrosse: Buzunar cu plasă rigidă; Buzunar înalt; Buzunar hibrid; Buzunar cu plasă; Buzunar mediu; Buzunar cu plasă semirigidă; Buzunar cu plasă semimoale; Buzunar cu plasă moale; Buzunar tradițional; Buzunar cu plasă cerată; Altele
de: Typ der Lacrosse-Tasche: Hard-Mesh-Tasche; Hohe Tasche; Hybrid-Tasche; Mesh-Tasche; Mittlere Tasche; Semi-Hard-Mesh-Tasche; Semi-Soft-Mesh-Tasche; Soft-Mesh-Tasche; Traditionelle Tasche; Wachsbeschichtete Mesh-Tasche; Sonstige
pt-BR: Lacrosse bolso tipo: Pocket com malha rígida; Pocket alto; Pocket híbrido; Pocket com malha; Pocket médio; Pocket com malha semirrígida; Pocket com malha semimacia; Pocket com malha macia; Pocket tradicional; Pocket com malha encerada; Outro
sv: Ficktyp för lacrosse: Ficka i hårt nät; Hög ficka; Hybridficka; Nätficka; Mellanhög ficka; Ficka i halvhårt nät; Ficka i halvmjukt nät; Ficka i mjukt nät; Traditionell ficka; Vaxad nätficka; Övrigt
pl: Typ kieszeni lacrosse: Koszyczek z twardej siatki; Wysoki koszyczek; Koszyczek hybrydowy; Koszyczek z siatki; Średni koszyczek; Koszyczek z półtwardej siatki; Koszyczek z półmiękkiej siatki; Koszyczek z miękkiej siatki; Koszyczek tradycyjny; Koszyczek z woskowanej siatki; Inne
nl: Lacrosse pocket type: Harde meshpocket; Hoge pocket; Hybride pocket; Meshpocket; Mid-pocket; Semi-harde meshpocket; Semi-zachte meshpocket; Zachte meshpocket; Traditionele pocket; Meshpocket met waxcoating; Overig
vi: Loại lưới Lacrosse: Lưới túi cứng; Túi cao; Túi lai; Túi lưới; Túi trung; Lưới túi bán cứng; Lưới túi bán mềm; Lưới túi mềm; Túi truyền thống; Lưới túi phủ sáp; Khác
el: Τύπος τσέπης λακρός: Pocket με σκληρό πλέγμα; High pocket; Υβριδικό pocket; Pocket με πλέγμα; Mid pocket; Pocket με ημίσκληρο πλέγμα; Pocket με ημιμαλακό πλέγμα; Pocket με μαλακό πλέγμα; Παραδοσιακό pocket; Pocket με πλέγμα με επικάλυψη κεριού; Άλλο
fr: Type de poche de crosse: Poche en filet dur; Poche haute; Poche hybride; Poche en filet; Poche moyenne; Poche en filet semi-dur; Poche en filet semi-souple; Poche en filet souple; Poche traditionnelle; Poche en filet enduit de cire; Autre
bg-BG: Тип джоб за лакрос: Джоб с твърда мрежа; Висок джоб; Хибриден джоб; Мрежест джоб; Среден джоб; Джоб с полутвърда мрежа; Джоб с полумека мрежа; Джоб с мека мрежа; Традиционен джоб; Джоб с мрежа с восъчно покритие; Друго
da: Typen af pocket i lacrosse-staven: Lomme i hårdt net; Høj lomme; Hybridlomme; Netlomme; Midterlomme; Halvhård netlomme; Halvblød netlomme; Blød netlomme; Traditionel lomme; Voksbelagt netlomme; Andet
zh-TW: 長曲棍球桿網袋類型: 硬網球袋; 高球袋; 混合球袋; 網狀球袋; 中球袋; 半硬網球袋; 半軟網球袋; 軟網球袋; 傳統球袋; 塗蠟網狀球袋; 其他
ko: 라크로스 포켓 유형: 하드 메시 포켓; 하이 포켓; 하이브리드 포켓; 메시 포켓; 미드 포켓; 세미 하드 메시 포켓; 세미 소프트 메시 포켓; 소프트 메시 포켓; 전통 포켓; 왁스 코팅 메시 포켓; 기타
it: Tipo di tasca da lacrosse: Tasca in rete rigida; Tasca alta; Tasca ibrida; Tasca in rete; Tasca media; Tasca in rete semirigida; Tasca in rete semimorbida; Tasca in rete morbida; Tasca tradizionale; Tasca in rete cerata; Altro
nb: Type lomme: Hard nettinglomme; Høy lomme; Hybridlomme; Nettinglomme; Midtlomme; Halvhard nettinglomme; Halvmyk nettinglomme; Myk nettinglomme; Tradisjonell lomme; Voksbelagt nettinglomme; Annet
lt-LT: Lakroso kišenės tipas: Kieta tinklinė kišenė; Aukšta kišenė; Hibridinė kišenė; Tinklinė kišenė; Vidurinė kišenė; Puskietė tinklinė kišenė; Pusminkštė tinklinė kišenė; Minkšta tinklinė kišenė; Tradicinė kišenė; Vašku padengta tinklinė kišenė; Kita
ja: ラクロスポケットタイプ: ハードメッシュポケット; ハイポケット; ハイブリッドポケット; メッシュポケット; ミドルポケット; セミハードメッシュポケット; セミソフトメッシュポケット; ソフトメッシュポケット; トラディショナルポケット; ワックスコーティングメッシュポケット; その他
th: ประเภทกระเป๋าลาครอส: พ็อกเก็ตตาข่ายแข็ง; พ็อกเก็ตสูง; พ็อกเก็ตไฮบริด; พ็อกเก็ตตาข่าย; พ็อกเก็ตระดับกลาง; พ็อกเก็ตตาข่ายกึ่งแข็ง; พ็อกเก็ตตาข่ายกึ่งอ่อน; พ็อกเก็ตตาข่ายอ่อน; พ็อกเก็ตแบบดั้งเดิม; พ็อกเก็ตตาข่ายเคลือบแว็กซ์; อื่นๆ